Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.070

Merchandise—Consigned or not owned by seller—Transfer—Additional.

(1) No person may sell consigned merchandise or other merchandise not owned by the person signing the notice at a going out of business sale. Merchandise ordered within thirty days of recording the notice of the sale may consist only of bona fide orders made in the usual course of business and may contain no merchandise taken on consignment or otherwise.

(2) No person in contemplation of conducting a going out of business sale may transfer merchandise from an affiliated business or business location to the location or locations of the sale.

(3) No person, after recording the notice of a going out of business sale, may buy or order merchandise, take merchandise on consignment, or receive a transfer of merchandise from an affiliated business or business location for the purpose of selling it at the sale or sell the merchandise in a going out of business sale.

[ 1993 c 456 s 9.]